Utah statutes.
34-48-203.   Chapter does not create duties.

(1)  This chapter does not create a duty for an employer to search or monitor the activity of a personal Internet account.

(2)  An employer is not liable under this chapter for failure to request or require that an employee or applicant for employment grant access to, allow observation of, or disclose information that allows access to or observation of the employee's or applicant for employment's personal Internet account.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

